Illinois, session 104th, HB2589.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hypodermic Syringes and Needles Act is 5amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 635/2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 22-51)7    Sec. 2. Sale of hypodermic syringes and needles. 8    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), no syringe, 9needle or instrument shall be delivered or sold to, or 10exchanged with, any person except a registered pharmacist, 11physician, dentist, veterinarian, registered embalmer, 12manufacturer or dealer in embalming supplies, wholesale 13druggist, manufacturing pharmacist, industrial user, a nurse 14upon the written order of a physician or dentist, the holder of 15a permit issued under Section 5 of this Act, a registered 16chiropodist, or an employee of an incorporated hospital upon 17the written order of its superintendent or officer in 18immediate charge; provided that the provisions of this Act 19shall not prohibit the sale, possession or use of hypodermic 20syringes or hypodermic needles for treatment of livestock or 21poultry by the owner or keeper thereof or a person engaged in 22chemical, clinical, pharmaceutical or other scientific 23research, or a staff person, volunteer, or participant in a   HB2589 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09144 RLC 19200 b1needle or hypodermic syringe access program.2    (b) A pharmacist may sell up to 100 sterile hypodermic 3syringes or needles to a person who is at least 18 years of 4age. A syringe or needle sold under this subsection (b) must be 5stored at a pharmacy and in a manner that limits access to the 6syringes or needles to pharmacists employed at the pharmacy 7and any persons designated by the pharmacists. A syringe or 8needle sold at a pharmacy under this subsection (b) may be sold 9only from the pharmacy department of the pharmacy.10    (c) If the pharmacy has sterile hypodermic syringes or 11needles in stock, a pharmacist, based on the pharmacist's 12professional and clinical judgment, shall sell sterile 13hypodermic syringes or needles to any qualifying individual 14when sterile hypodermic syringes or needles are required for 15the proper utilization or administration of medications, 16including any counseling or referrals to relevant healthcare 17services. 18(Source: P.A. 100-326, eff. 1-1-18; 101-356, eff. 8-9-19.)